Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Highways, Districts, Signals, and the Like Defined

§ 63-3-123.
Traffic.

“Traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, street cars, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8143; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-125.
Streets, roads, and highways.

“Street or highway” means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.

“Laned highway” means a highway the roadway of which is divided into three or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic.

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel.

“Sidewalk” means that portion of a street between curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines intended for the use of pedestrians.

“Private road or driveway” means every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other persons.

“Through highway” means every highway or portion thereof at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to stop before entering or crossing the same and when stop signs are erected as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8137; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-127.
Crosswalks.

“Crosswalk” means that portion of a roadway ordinarily included within the prolongation or connection of the lateral lines of sidewalks at intersections, or any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8139; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-129.
Intersections.

“Intersection” means the area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two highways which join one another at or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8138; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-131.
Safety zones.

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8140; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-133.
Traffic signals or devices.

“Official traffic-control devices” means all signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with this chapter placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic.

“Official traffic-control signal” means any device, whether manually, electrically or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and to proceed.

“Railroad sign or signal” means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8142; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-135.
Right-of-way.

“Right-of-way” means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8144; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1956, ch. 327.

§ 63-3-137.
Stopping, standing, and parking.

“Stop,” when required, means the complete cessation from movement.

“Stop, stopping or standing,” when prohibited, means any stopping or standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or of a traffic control sign or signal.

“Park,” when prohibited, means the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8144; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1956, ch. 327.

§ 63-3-139.
Districts.

“Business district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway when fifty percent (50%) or more of the frontage thereon for a distance of 300 feet or more is occupied by buildings in use for business.

“Residence district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district when the property on such highway for a distance of 300 feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8141; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.